Nebraska, session 109, LB5.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB5 LB5
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 28-470, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-470 (1) A health professional who is authorized to prescribe or
dispense an opioid antagonist naloxone, if acting with reasonable care,
may prescribe, administer, or dispense an opioid antagonist naloxone to
any of the following persons without being subject to administrative
action or criminal prosecution:
(a) A person who is apparently experiencing or who is likely to
experience an opioid-related overdose; or
(b) A family member, friend, or other person in a position to assist
a person who is apparently experiencing or who is likely to experience an
opioid-related overdose.
(2) A family member, friend, or other person, including school
personnel, who is in a position to assist a person who is apparently
experiencing or who is likely to experience an opioid-related overdose,
other than an emergency responder or peace officer, is not subject to
actions under the Uniform Credentialing Act, administrative action, or
criminal prosecution if the person, acting in good faith, obtains an
opioid antagonist naloxone from a health professional or a prescription
for an opioid antagonist naloxone from a health professional and
administers the opioid antagonist naloxone obtained from the health
professional or acquired pursuant to the prescription to a person who is
apparently experiencing an opioid-related overdose.
(3) An emergency responder who, acting in good faith, obtains an
opioid antagonist naloxone from the emergency responder's emergency
medical service organization and administers the opioid antagonist
naloxone to a person who is apparently experiencing an opioid-related
overdose shall not be:
(a) Subject to administrative action or criminal prosecution; or
(b) Personally liable in any civil action to respond in damages as a
result of his or her acts of commission or omission arising out of and in
-2-

LB5 LB5
2025 2025
the course of his or her rendering such care or services or arising out
of his or her failure to act to provide or arrange for further medical
treatment or care for the person who is apparently experiencing an
opioid-related overdose, unless the emergency responder caused damage or
injury by his or her willful, wanton, or grossly negligent act of
commission or omission. This subdivision shall not affect the liability
of such emergency medical service organization for the emergency
responder's acts of commission or omission.
(4) A peace officer or law enforcement employee who, acting in good
faith, obtains an opioid antagonist naloxone from the peace officer's or
employee's law enforcement agency and administers the opioid antagonist
naloxone to a person who is apparently experiencing an opioid-related
overdose shall not be:
(a) Subject to administrative action or criminal prosecution; or
(b) Personally liable in any civil action to respond in damages as a
result of his or her acts of commission or omission arising out of and in
the course of his or her rendering such care or services or arising out
of his or her failure to act to provide or arrange for further medical
treatment or care for the person who is apparently experiencing an
opioid-related overdose, unless the peace officer or employee caused
damage or injury by his or her willful, wanton, or grossly negligent act
of commission or omission. This subdivision shall not affect the
liability of such law enforcement agency for the peace officer's or
employee's acts of commission or omission.
(5) For purposes of this section:
(a) Administer has the same meaning as in section 38-2806;
(b) Dispense has the same meaning as in section 38-2817;
(c) Emergency responder means an emergency medical responder, an
emergency medical technician, an advanced emergency medical technician,
or a paramedic licensed under the Emergency Medical Services Practice Act
or practicing pursuant to the EMS Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact;
-3-

LB5 LB5
2025 2025
(d) Health professional means a physician, physician assistant,
nurse practitioner, or pharmacist licensed under the Uniform
Credentialing Act;
(e) Law enforcement agency means a police department, a town
marshal, the office of sheriff, or the Nebraska State Patrol;
(f) Law enforcement employee means an employee of a law enforcement
agency, a contractor of a law enforcement agency, or an employee of such
contractor who regularly, as part of his or her duties, handles,
processes, or is likely to come into contact with any evidence or
property which may include or contain opioids;
(g) Opioid antagonist means naloxone hydrochloride or any other
opioid antagonist that is approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration for emergency reversal of known or suspected opioid
overdose Naloxone means naloxone hydrochloride; and
(h) Peace officer has the same meaning as in section 49-801.
Sec. 2. Original section 28-470, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-4-